District of Columbia statutes.
29-405.24

Quorum and voting requirements for voting groups.

(a)

Members entitled to vote as a separate voting group may take action on a matter at a meeting only if a quorum of those members exists with respect to that matter. Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the matter by the voting group constitutes a quorum of that voting group for action on that matter.

(b)

Once a member is represented for any purpose at a meeting, the member shall be deemed present for quorum purposes for the remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that meeting unless a new record date is or must be set for that adjourned meeting.

(c)

If a quorum exists, action on a matter, other than the election of directors, by a voting group is approved if the votes cast within the voting group favoring the action exceed the votes cast opposing the action, unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require a greater number of affirmative votes.

(d)

An amendment of the articles of incorporation or bylaws adding, changing, or deleting a quorum or voting requirement for a voting group greater than specified in subsection (a) or (c) of this section shall be governed by § 29-405.26.

(e)

If a meeting cannot be organized because a quorum is not present, those members present may adjourn the meeting to such time and place as they may determine. Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, when a meeting that has been adjourned for lack of a quorum is reconvened, those members present, although less than a quorum as fixed in this section, the articles, or the bylaws, nonetheless constitute a quorum.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-401.50 and § 29-405.25.